New York, session 2025-2026, S8276.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 76 to read as follows: 3 76. In the county of Rockland, the provisions of this section requir- 4 ing a person to be a resident of the political subdivision or municipal 5 corporation of the state for which they shall be chosen or within which 6 their official functions are required to be exercised, shall not prevent 7 a person from holding the office of the assistant county attorney of the 8 county of Rockland, provided that such person resides in Rockland coun- 9 ty, any county of the Ninth Judicial District of New York, New York 10 city, or any other adjoining county; provided, however that any person 11 performing such functions or holding the office of the assistant county 12 attorney in any other county shall be a resident of such county unless 13 otherwise provided by law. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11898-01-5